Maryland, session 2026, HB1640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 2–1205, 2–1601, and 2–1602 of Article – Environment of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–203, 7–220
through 7–228, 7–512.1, and 7–701 through 7–714 of Article – Public Utilities of the
Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 9–2017 of Article –
State Government of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 8–401 through
8–417 of the Article – Tax – General of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations

HOUSE BILL 1640 5
5–637.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, this subtitle
applies to the provision of broadband Internet service by a member–regulated cooperative.
(2) A member–regulated cooperative may not, for the sole purpose of
providing broadband Internet service, exercise the power of condemnation under §
5–607(a)(16) of this subtitle.
(b) A member–regulated cooperative is subject to the following provisions of the
Public Utilities Article:
(1) § 5–103;
(2) § 5–201;
(3) § 5–202;
(4) § 5–303;
(5) § 5–304;
(6) § 5–306;
(7) § 7–103;
(8) § 7–104;
(9) [§ 7–203;
(10)] § 7–207;
[(11) Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II;
(12)] (10) § 7–302;
[(13)] (11) Title 7, Subtitle 5, Part I and Part II;
[(14) Title 7, Subtitle 7;] and
[(15)] (12) § 13–101.
Article – Economic Development
10–801.

HOUSE BILL 1640
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Advanced clean energy” includes:
(8) other qualifying biomass [as defined in § 7–701 of the Public Utilities
Article];
(O–1) “QUALIFYING BIOMASS” MEANS A NONHAZARDOUS, ORGANIC
MATERIAL THAT IS AVAILABLE ON A RENEWABLE OR RECURRING BASIS, AND IS
WASTE MATERIAL THAT IS SEGREGATED FROM INORGANIC WASTE MATERIAL AND IS
DERIVED FROM SOURCES, INCLUDING:
(1) EXCEPT FOR OLD GROWTH TIMBER, ANY OF THE FOLLOWING
FOREST–RELATED RESOURCES:
(I) MILL RESIDUE, EXCEPT SAWDUST AND WOOD SHAVINGS;
(II) PRECOMMERCIAL SOFT WOOD THINNING;
(III) SLASH;
(IV) BRUSH; OR
(V) YARD WASTE;
(2) A PALLET, CRATE, OR DUNNAGE;
(3) AGRICULTURAL AND SILVICULTURAL SOURCES, INCLUDING TREE
CROPS, VINEYARD MATERIALS, GRAIN, LEGUMES, SUGAR, AND OTHER CROP
BY–PRODUCTS OR RESIDUE; OR
(4) GAS PRODUCED FROM THE ANAEROBIC DECOMPOSITION OF
ANIMAL WASTE OR POULTRY WASTE.
Article – Environment
2–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “PJM Region” [has the meaning stated under § 7–701 of the Public Utilities
Article] MEANS THE CONTROL AREA ADMINISTERED BY THE PJM
INTERCONNECTION, INC. AS THE AREA MAY CHANGE FROM TIME TO TIME.

HOUSE BILL 1640 7
Article – Housing and Community Development
2–102.
(a) The Department shall:
(1) encourage and assist political subdivisions and public and private
community organizations to develop mutual and cooperative solutions to their common
problems;
(2) serve as a clearinghouse for information and materials that may be
pertinent to sound community assistance, including information on available federal, State,
and private financial assistance and technical assistance;
(3) implement model or demonstration programs and projects or otherwise
provide a program of practical research in community assistance;
(4) provide grants and loans for energy conservation and the use of solar
energy in commercial and residential buildings;
(5) provide advisory, consultative, training, and educational services, and
technical assistance to any political subdivision, local public agency, or nonprofit
organization for community assistance purposes;
(6) contract for and accept a gift, grant, contribution, or loan of money,
property, or other aid for community assistance from a governmental unit, the federal
government, or another source and comply with the terms and conditions of that aid;
(7) attach terms and conditions to financial assistance as the Secretary
determines;
(8) participate with political subdivisions, regional governments,
organizations, and the federal government in developing, financing, and implementing a
program to build the management capabilities of municipal corporations by supplying
needed managerial expertise through circuit riding managers; AND
(9) administer federal programs relating to community assistance[; and
(10) develop and implement a weatherization program in accordance with
Title 4 of this article and administer the low–income weatherization component of the
electric universal service program in accordance with § 7–512.1 of the Public Utilities
Article].
6–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1640
(c) “Business entity” means a person that conducts a trade or business in the
State and is subject to:
(1) the State income tax on individuals or corporations; OR
(2) [the public service company franchise tax; or
(3)] the insurance premiums tax.
Article – Natural Resources
3–302.
(a) [(1)] There is an Environmental Trust Fund.
[(2) (i) For the purpose of this subtitle, there is established as an added
cost of electricity distributed to retail electric customers within the State, an environmental
surcharge per kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed in the State to be paid by any
electric company as defined in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities Article.
(ii) The Public Service Commission shall impose the surcharge per
kilowatt hour of electric energy distributed to retail electric customers within the State and
shall authorize the electric companies to add the full amount of the surcharge to retail
electric customers’ bills.
(iii) To the extent that the surcharge is not collected from retail
electric customers, the surcharge shall be deemed a cost of distribution and shall be allowed
and computed as such, together with other allowable expenses, for rate–making purposes.
(iv) Revenues from the surcharge shall be collected by the
Comptroller and placed in the Fund.]
(b) [(1) (i)] The Secretary, in consultation with the Director of the Maryland
Energy Administration, annually shall coordinate the preparation of a budget required to
carry out the provisions of this subtitle.
[(ii) On approval of the budget by the General Assembly, the Public
Service Commission shall establish the amount of the surcharge per kilowatt hour for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 1972, and for each subsequent fiscal year.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, the amount of the
surcharge for each account for each retail electric customer may not exceed the lesser of
0.15 mill per kilowatt hour or $1,000 per month and the surcharge may not continue beyond
fiscal year 2030.
(3) (i) The Comptroller shall maintain the method of collection of the

HOUSE BILL 1640 9
surcharge from the companies and the collections shall accrue to the Fund.
(ii) The Department shall credit against the amount required to be
paid into the Environmental Trust Fund by each electric company an amount equal to
0.75% of the total surcharge attributed to each company on the basis of the electricity
distributed within Maryland.]
5–102.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(9) Forests are a renewable resource that help the State meet its renewable
energy goals that are consistent with the State’s:
(i) Green power goal for State facilities;
(ii) [Renewable Energy Portfolio Standard;
(iii)] Healthy Air Act; and
[(iv)] (III) Maryland Clean Energy Incentive Act of 2006; and
Article – Public Utilities
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(6) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission line
that is designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would allow an out–of–state
Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of the electric system in
Maryland that is owned by an electric company.]
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, unless
a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from
the Commission, a person may not begin construction in the State of:
1. a generating station; OR
2. [a qualified generator lead line; or
3.] an energy storage device that is part of a proposal
approved by the Commission under § 7–1206 of this title.
(ii) A person is not required to obtain a certificate of public
convenience and necessity under this section if the person obtains:

HOUSE BILL 1640
1. Commission approval for construction under § 7–207.1 of
this subtitle; or
2. a distributed generation certificate of public convenience
and necessity under § 7–207.4 of this subtitle.
[(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a person
may not apply to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction of
a qualified generator lead line unless:
1. at least 90 days before the filing of an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the person had in good faith offered the
electric company that owns that portion of the electric grid in Maryland to which the
qualified generator lead line would interconnect a full and fair opportunity for the electric
company to construct the qualified generator lead line; and
2. at any time at least 10 days before the filing of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the electric company:
A. did not accept from the person a proposal or a negotiated
version of the proposal under which the electric company would construct the qualified
generator lead line; or
B. stated in writing that the electric company did not intend
to construct the qualified generator lead line.
(iv)] (III) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction of a generating station
that is part of a proposal approved by the Commission under § 7–1206 of this title shall be
issued in accordance with § 7–207.4 of this subtitle.
[(v)] (IV) When a person applies for a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of a generating station under this section,
the application shall state whether the proposed generating station or the proposed
modification is part of a proposal approved by the Commission under § 7–1206 of this title.
[(vi)] (V) 1. The Commission may prioritize the review of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity under § 7–207.4 of this
subtitle over the review of an application for a certificate of public convenience and
necessity under this section.
2. The Commission may extend the time for the review of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section if, in
accordance with subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the Commission has prioritized
the review of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity under §
7–207.4 of this subtitle over the review of the application for a certificate of public

HOUSE BILL 1640 11
convenience and necessity under this section.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall provide an opportunity for public
comment and hold a public hearing on the application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity in each county and municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of a generating station[,] OR an overhead transmission line designed to carry
a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts[, or a qualified generator lead line] is proposed to be
located.
(ii) The Commission may hold the public hearing virtually rather
than in person if the Commission provides a comparable opportunity for public comment
and participation in the hearing.
(2) The Commission shall hold the public hearing jointly with the
governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station[,] OR overhead transmission line[, or qualified
generator lead line] is proposed to be located, unless the governing body declines to
participate in the hearing.
(3) (i) Once in each of the 4 successive weeks immediately before the
hearing date, the Commission shall provide weekly notice of the public hearing and an
opportunity for public comment:
1. by advertisement in a newspaper of general circulation in
the county or municipal corporation affected by the application;
2. on two types of social media; and
3. on the Commission’s website.
(ii) Before a public hearing, the Commission shall coordinate with
the governing body of the county or municipal corporation in which any portion of the
construction of the generating station[,] OR overhead transmission line[, or qualified
generator lead line] is proposed to be located to identify additional options for providing, in
an efficient and cost–effective manner, notice of the public hearing through other types of
media that are familiar to the residents of the county or municipal corporation.
(e) The Commission shall take final action on an application for a certificate of
public convenience and necessity only after due consideration of:
(1) the recommendation of the governing body of each county or municipal
corporation in which any portion of the construction of the generating station[,] OR
overhead transmission line[, or qualified generator lead line] is proposed to be located;
(2) the effect of the generating [station,] STATION OR overhead
transmission line[, or qualified generator lead line] on:

HOUSE BILL 1640
(i) the stability and reliability of the electric system;
(ii) economics;
(iii) esthetics;
(iv) historic sites;
(v) aviation safety as determined by the Maryland Aviation
Administration and the administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration;
(vi) when applicable, air quality and water pollution; and
(vii) the availability of means for the required timely disposal of
wastes produced by any generating station;
(3) the effect of climate change on the generating [station,] STATION OR
overhead transmission line[, or qualified generator lead line] based on the best available
scientific information recognized by the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change;
7–208.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Construction” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this subtitle.
(3) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of an interruption of service from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the

HOUSE BILL 1640 13
Department of the Environment; and
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (i) of this paragraph.
(4) [“Qualified offshore wind project” has the meaning stated in § 7–701 of
this title.
(5)] “Qualified submerged renewable energy line” means[:
(i) a line carrying electricity supply and connecting a qualified
offshore wind project to the transmission system; and
(ii)] a line in which the portions of the line crossing any submerged
lands or any part of a beach erosion control district are buried or submerged.
7–306.2.
(b) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) community solar energy generating systems:
(i) provide residents and businesses, including those that lease
property, increased access to local solar electricity while encouraging private investment in
solar resources; AND
(ii) [enhance continued diversification of the State’s energy resource
mix to achieve the State’s renewable energy portfolio standard and Greenhouse Gas
Emissions Reduction Act goals; and
(iii)] provide electric companies and ratepayers the opportunity to
realize the many benefits associated with distributed energy; and
(f) (1) Subject to subsection (h) of this section, to implement the Program, the
Commission shall, on or before January 1, 2025, adopt revisions to the regulations adopted
under subsection (e) of this section for the pilot program, including revisions that:
(iv) allow a subscriber organization or subscription coordinator to
verify the income of a prospective subscriber for eligibility as an LMI subscriber under the
Program by using one of the following methods:
1. self–attestation by the prospective subscriber that does

HOUSE BILL 1640
not need to be under oath or penalty of perjury;
2. requiring the prospective subscriber to provide evidence of
eligibility for or enrollment in at least one of the following government assistance programs:
A. the Maryland Energy Assistance Program;
B. the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program;
C. Medicaid;
D. Head Start;
E. free and reduced price school meals;
F. the federal Low Income Home Energy Assistance
Program;
G. [EmPOWER Maryland low– or moderate–income
incentives;
H.] telephone lifeline service;
[I.] H. the Fuel Fund of Maryland; or
[J.] I. any additional federal, State, or local assistance
program that the Commission determines will further the purposes of the Program;
3. pay stubs;
4. income tax documents;
5. proof of residence in an affordable housing facility;
6. proof of residence within a census tract that is:
A. an overburdened community; and
B. an underserved community;
7. any verification method that was available under the pilot
program; or
8. any additional methods approved by the Commission to
verify income;
7–321.

HOUSE BILL 1640 15
(A) A PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANY MAY NOT INCLUDE IN ANY RETAIL
ELECTRIC OR GAS BILL ANY STATE–MANDATED TAX, SURCHARGE, RIDER,
ASSESSMENT, OR OTHER CHARGE THAT IS NOT DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
UTILITY’S COST OF PROVIDING DISTRIBUTION, TRANSMISSION, ENERGY
GENERATION PROCUREMENT, OR ELECTRIC OR GAS SUPPLY SERVICE.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE ANY TARIFF THAT INCLUDES
RECOVERY OF A STATE–IMPOSED POLICY MANDATE.
(C) ANY STATE PROGRAM RELATED TO ENERGY SHALL BE FINANCED
SOLELY THROUGH DIRECT LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATION FROM THE GENERAL
FUND OF THE STATE.
7–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) (1) “Public purpose program” means a program implemented with the
intention of furthering a public purpose.
(2) “Public purpose program” includes:
(i) [a universal service program;
(ii)] a program encouraging renewable energy resources;
[(iii)] (II) a demand side management or other energy efficiency or
conservation program; and
[(iv)] (III) a consumer education program.
[(q) (1) “Universal service program” means a program that helps low–income
customers maintain electric service.
(2) “Universal service program” includes customer bill assistance and
payment programs, termination of service protection, and policies and services that help
low–income customers to reduce or manage energy consumption in a cost–effective
manner.]
7–505.
(b) (1) The Commission shall issue the orders or adopt the regulations
required under this subsection before the implementation of customer choice.

HOUSE BILL 1640
[(2) The Commission shall order a universal service program, to be made
available on a statewide basis, to benefit low–income customers, in accordance with §
7–512.1 of this subtitle.]
[(3)] (2) The Commission shall order an electric company to adopt policies
and practices reasonably designed to prevent:
(i) discrimination against a person, locality, or particular class of
service or giving undue or unreasonable preference in favor of the electric company’s own
electricity supply, other services, divisions, or affiliates, if any; and
(ii) any other forms of self–dealing or practices that could result in
noncompetitive electricity prices to customers.
[(4)] (3) (i) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each
electric company and electricity supplier to provide adequate and accurate information to
each customer on the available electric services of the electric company or electricity
supplier, including disclosure, every 6 months, of a uniform common set of information
about:
1. the fuel mix of the electricity purchased by customers,
including categories of electricity from coal, natural gas, nuclear, oil, hydroelectric, solar,
biomass, wind, and other resources, or disclosure of a regional fuel mix average; and
2. the emissions, on a pound per megawatt–hour basis, of
pollutants identified by the Commission, or disclosure of a regional fuel mix average.
(ii) The Commission may require an electric company or an
electricity supplier to provide documentation supporting the disclosures required under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (4) (i) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require the
unbundling of electric company rates, charges, and services into standardized categories
determined by the Commission.
(ii) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require that
customers’ bills for electricity service indicate charges for:
1. distribution and transmission;
2. transition charge or credit;
3. [universal service program charges;
4.] customer charges;

HOUSE BILL 1640 17
[5.] 4. taxes; and
[6.] 5. other charges identified by the Commission.
[(6)] (5) The Commission shall issue orders or regulations to prevent an
electric company and an electricity supplier from disclosing a retail electric customer’s
billing, payment, and credit information without the retail electric customer’s consent,
except as allowed by the Commission for bill collection or credit rating reporting purposes.
[(7)] (6) An electricity supplier may not engage in marketing, advertising,
or trade practices that are unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive.
[(8)] (7) The Commission shall determine the terms, conditions, and rates
of standard offer service in accordance with:
(i) Title 4 of this article; or
(ii) as applicable, § 7–510(c)(4) of this subtitle.
[(9)] (8) In connection with § 7–513 of this subtitle, the Commission may
not require an electric company to divest itself of a generation asset or prohibit an electric
company from divesting itself voluntarily of a generation asset.
[(10)] (9) (i) On or before July 1, 2000, the Commission shall issue
orders or adopt regulations reasonably designed to ensure the creation of competitive
electricity supply and electricity supply services markets, with appropriate customer
safeguards.
(ii) On or before July 1, 2000, the Commission shall require:
1. an appropriate code of conduct between the electric
company and an affiliate providing electricity supply and electricity supply services in the
State;
2. access by electricity suppliers and customers to the electric
company’s transmission and distribution system on a nondiscriminatory basis;
3. appropriate complaint and enforcement procedures; and
4. any other safeguards deemed necessary by the
Commission to ensure the creation and maintenance of a competitive electricity supply and
electricity supply services market.
(iii) On or before July 1, 2000, the Commission shall require, among
other factors, functional, operational, structural, or legal separation between the electric
company’s regulated businesses and its nonregulated businesses or nonregulated affiliates.

HOUSE BILL 1640
[(11)] (10) Nothing in this title may be construed as preventing the
application of State and federal consumer protection and antitrust laws to electric
companies and their affiliates, and to electricity suppliers.
[(12)] (11) The Commission, in consultation with the Department of the
Environment, shall adopt appropriate measures to maintain environmental standards,
adapt existing programs, and develop new programs as appropriate to ensure compliance
with federal and State environmental protection standards.
[(13)] (12) (i) An electric company shall comply with all requirements of
the Commission in conducting regulated operations in compliance with this division.
(ii) The Commission shall require each electric company to adopt a
code of conduct to be approved by the Commission by a date to be determined by the
Commission to prevent regulated service customers from subsidizing the services of
unregulated businesses or affiliates of the electric company.
(d) (1) The Commission shall cap, for 4 years after initial implementation of
customer choice in the electric company’s distribution territory, the total of the rates of an
electric company charged to a retail electric customer at the actual level of the rates in
effect or authorized by the Commission on the date immediately preceding the initial
implementation of customer choice in the electric company’s distribution territory.
(2) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the
cap required under paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to the recovery of costs
added after January 1, 2000, in accordance with § 7–512(c) of this subtitle.
(ii) The cap required under paragraph (1) of this subsection applies
to the recovery of:
1. any transition costs under § 7–513 of this subtitle; AND
2. any costs included in rates on January 1, 2000, in
accordance with § 7–512(c) of this subtitle[; and
3. costs for the universal service program established under
§ 7–512.1 of this subtitle].
(3) As part of a settlement, the Commission may approve a cap for a
different time period or an alternative price protection plan that the Commission
determines is equally protective of ratepayers.
(4) (i) 1. Subject to the provisions of paragraph (5) of this
subsection, the Commission shall reduce residential rates for each investor–owned electric
company by an amount between 3% and 7.5% of base rates, as measured on June 30, 1999.

HOUSE BILL 1640 19
2. The reduction required under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph shall begin on the initial implementation date and remain in effect for 4
years.
3. The Commission shall determine the allocation of the rate
reduction among the generation, transmission, and distribution residential rate
components.
(ii) In achieving the rate reduction required under subparagraph (i)
of this paragraph, the Commission shall consider:
1. the expiration of any surcharge;
2. changes in the electric company’s tax liability;
3. cost of service determinations ordered by the Commission;
4. net transition costs or benefits;
5. the effect on the competitive electricity supply market;
6. whether the rate reduction and rate cap will unduly
impair the electric company’s financial condition; AND
7. [the costs associated with the universal service program;
and
8.] the interests of the public, including shareholders of the
electric company.
(iii) The Commission may, within the parameters provided in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, increase or decrease the actual rate reduction required.
(iv) The Commission may allow the recovery of any extraordinary
costs based on the circumstances of an individual electric company if the Commission
determines that the action is necessary and in the public interest.
(v) In determining the rate reduction required under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, the Commission may not increase rates for nonresidential customers.
(5) The requirements of paragraph (4) of this subsection do not apply to an
electric company if the Commission approves or has in effect a settlement that the
Commission determines is equally protective of ratepayers.
7–510.3.

HOUSE BILL 1640
(k) (1) [Except for the purposes of meeting the requirements of the renewable
energy portfolio standard under Subtitle 7 of this title, a] A community choice aggregator
may not be considered to be an electricity supplier under § 7–507(a) of this subtitle.
7–512.
(c) (1) An electric company shall be provided a fair opportunity to recover fully
all costs that have been or will be incurred by the electric company under public purpose
programs established by law or ordered by the Commission.
(2) [(i)] Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the costs
subject to this subsection shall be funded by a surcharge or other cost recovery mechanism
collected on a statewide basis that:
[1.] (I) fully recovers from customers the costs of the plans
and programs; and
[2.] (II) subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, with
respect to any of these costs not included in rates on January 1, 2000, is not subject to any
otherwise applicable cap.
[(ii) The recovery by an electric company of costs for a universal
service program is subject to any applicable cap regardless of when the costs are included
in rates.]
(3) During the fiscal year ending June 30, 2000, an electric company may
not, under paragraph (2) of this subsection, recover costs of a consumer education program
established by law, regulation, or order.
7–1001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (1) “Renewable on–site generating system” means an energy system
located on a customer’s premises that:
(i) generates or stores electricity from a [Tier 1 renewable source or
a Tier 2 renewable] source that does not release greenhouse gases;
(ii) is capable of providing electricity to:
1. a home, business, or other structure serviced by an electric
company; and
2. the electric distribution system;

HOUSE BILL 1640 21
(iii) is paired with an energy storage device that is configured to
charge from:
1. the renewable source; and
2. the electric distribution system unless, for the purpose of
eligibility for net energy metering, the device is required to be charged only from the
renewable source; and
(iv) is interconnected and operates in parallel with an electric
company’s transmission and distribution facilities.
(2) “Renewable on–site generating system” may include bidirectional
electric vehicle service equipment located on a customer’s premises.
[(j) “Tier 1 renewable source” has the meaning stated in § 7–701 of this title.
(k) “Tier 2 renewable source” has the meaning stated in § 7–701 of this title.]
7–1103.
(a) (1) (i) The Administration shall coordinate funding sources, including
all available federal funding, philanthropic funding, [funding available under the
EmPOWER Maryland Program,] and Strategic Energy Investment Fund funding allocated
to energy efficiency, to assist an electric company, a gas company, or a water company in
covering the costs for all behind–the–meter projects, including full electrification,
associated with a thermal energy network system so that any affected residential
customers are not required to pay for connection to the thermal energy network system or
any appliance replacements required for electrification.
7–1207.
The Commission shall include specifications in a solicitation issued under § 7–1206
of this subtitle that require each proposal for a dispatchable energy generation project and
large capacity energy resource project to:
(4) if applicable, include a description of:
(i) [the type and amount of co–located energy generation from Tier
1 renewable sources, as defined in § 7–701 of this title, that would be used with the project;
(ii)] the amount of co–located energy storage that would be used with
the project;
[(iii)] (II) the use of carbon capture or sequestration technology to
mitigate greenhouse gas emissions from the project; and

HOUSE BILL 1640
[(iv)] (III) the amount of hydrogen or zero–emissions biofuels that
the project will mix with natural gas for energy generation; and
7–1220.
(c) [(1)] Each electric company shall procure from the escrow account
established by regulation under this section a quantity of zero–emission credits equal to
the electric company’s respective percentage of retail electric sales each year.
[(2) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the Commission
establishes, if there are insufficient zero–emission credits available to satisfy the electric
companies’ zero–emission credit purchase obligations, the overpayment shall be distributed
to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the
customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the renewable energy
portfolio standard.]
7–1225.
[(c) Front–of–the–meter transmission energy storage devices paired with Tier 1
or Tier 2 renewable sources, as defined under § 7–701 of this title, may be included in a
proposal in response to a procurement solicitation under § 7–1224 of this subtitle.]
Article – State Finance and Procurement
13–217.
[(f) (1) On the recommendation of the Secretary of General Services, the Board
may waive the requirement to include an automatic termination clause under subsection
(e) of this section for a multi–year contract to procure energy generated from a Tier 1
renewable source or a Tier 2 renewable source, as defined in § 7–701 of the Public Utilities
Article.
(2) In determining whether or not to grant a waiver under paragraph (1) of
this subsection, the Board shall consider the effect of imposing the termination clause
requirement under subsection (e) of this section on the ability of the energy supplier to
obtain financing for the renewable energy generation project that produces the energy that
the State is contracting to procure.]
Article – State Government
9–2016.
(f) A grant awarded under subsection (e) of this section shall be funded from [fees
collected under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article and allocated in accordance
with § 9–20B–05(g–1) of this title] THE MARYLAND STRATEGIC ENERGY INVESTMENT

HOUSE BILL 1640 23
FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20B–05 OF THIS TITLE.
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to implement the Strategic Energy Investment
Program.
(c) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2) money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
(3) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans made
from the Fund;
(4) [compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article;
(5)] money received from any public or private source for the benefit of the
Fund;
[(6)] (5) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §
7–207.2(d)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
[(7)] (6) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(1) to invest in the promotion, development, and implementation of:
(i) cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs,
projects, or activities, including measurement and verification of energy savings;
(ii) renewable and clean energy resources;
(iii) climate change programs directly related to reducing or

HOUSE BILL 1640
mitigating the effects of climate change; and
(iv) demand response programs that are designed to promote
changes in electric usage by customers in response to:
1. changes in the price of electricity over time; or
2. incentives designed to induce lower electricity use at times
of high wholesale market prices or when system reliability is jeopardized;
(2) to provide targeted programs, projects, activities, and investments to
reduce electricity consumption by customers in the low–income and moderate–income
residential sectors;
(3) [to provide supplemental funds for low–income energy assistance
through the Electric Universal Service Program established under § 7–512.1 of the Public
Utilities Article and other electric assistance programs in the Department of Human
Services;
(4) to provide rate relief by offsetting electricity rates of residential
customers, including an offset of surcharges imposed on ratepayers under Title 7, Subtitle
2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article;
(5)] to provide grants, loans, and other assistance and investment as
necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes of the Program as set forth in §
9–20B–03 of this subtitle;
[(6)] (4) to implement energy–related public education and outreach
initiatives regarding reducing energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions;
[(7)] (5) to provide rebates under the Electric Vehicle Recharging
Equipment Rebate Program established under § 9–2009 of this title;
[(8)] (6) to provide grants to encourage combined heat and power projects
at industrial facilities;
[(9)] (7) to provide at least $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for fiscal year
2025 through fiscal year 2028 to the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund established under
§ 10–858 of the Economic Development Article;
[(10)] (8) subject to subsection (f–2) of this section, to provide at least
$2,100,000 in funding each fiscal year to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund established
under § 10–835 of the Economic Development Article;
[(11)] (9) to provide at least $500,000 each year to the Resiliency Hub
Grant Program Fund under § 9–2011 of this title;

HOUSE BILL 1640 25
[(12)] (10) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program
under § 9–2016 of this title;
[(13)] (11) notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section, to pay costs
associated with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the
Environment; and
[(14)] (12) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(f–1) (1) Any funding provided under subsection [(f)(9)] (F)(7) of this section
that is not spent in a given fiscal year shall revert to the Fund in the following fiscal year.
(2) The Administration may provide additional funding for the purposes
stated in subsection [(f)(9)] (F)(7) of this section.
(f–2) Of the funds transferred to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund under
subsection [(f)(10)] (F)(8) of this section:
(1) at least $1,200,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Clean Energy
Center established under § 10–806 of the Economic Development Article; and
(2) at least $900,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Energy Innovation
Institute established under § 10–829 of the Economic Development Article.
(g) Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for the Electric Universal Service Program and other electricity assistance programs in the
Department of Human Services;
(2) at least 20% shall be credited to a low and moderate income efficiency
and conservation programs account and to a general efficiency and conservation programs
account for energy efficiency and conservation programs, projects, or activities and demand
response programs, of which at least one–half shall be targeted to the low and moderate
income efficiency and conservation programs account for:
(i) the low–income residential sector at no cost to the participants
of the programs, projects, or activities; and
(ii) the moderate–income residential sector;
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs
account for:

HOUSE BILL 1640
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; and
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; and
(4) up to 10%, but not more than $7,500,000, shall be credited to an
administrative expense account for costs related to the administration of the Fund,
including the review of electric company plans for achieving electricity savings and demand
reductions that the electric companies are required under law to submit to the
Administration.
[(g–1) Proceeds received by the Fund from compliance fees under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of
the Public Utilities Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) beginning in fiscal year 2025, at least 20% of the proceeds shall be used
to provide grants to support the installation of new solar energy generating systems under
the Customer–Sited Solar Program;
(2) up to 10% of the proceeds shall be credited to an administrative expense
account for costs related to the administration of the Fund;
(3) proceeds collected but unused from a previous year shall be used before
proceeds allocated for the current year; and
(4) the Administration shall reallocate to other authorized uses any
proceeds that are not used within 3 fiscal years after collection.]
(h) (1) Energy efficiency and conservation programs under subsection (g)(2) of
this section include:
(i) low–income energy efficiency programs;
(ii) residential and small business energy efficiency programs;
(iii) commercial and industrial energy efficiency programs;
(iv) State and local energy efficiency programs;
(v) demand response programs;
(vi) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(vii) grants to training funds and other organizations supporting job
training for deployment of energy efficiency and energy conservation technology and
equipment.

HOUSE BILL 1640 27
(2) Energy–related public education and outreach and renewable and clean
energy programs and initiatives under subsection (g)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section include:
(i) production incentives for specified renewable energy sources;
(ii) expansion of existing grant programs for solar, geothermal, and
wind programs;
(iii) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(iv) consumer education and outreach programs that are designed to
reach low–income communities.
(i) [(1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b) of the Public Utilities Article may be used only to
make loans and grants to support the creation of new Tier 1 renewable energy sources in
the State that are owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
or
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities
Article shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make
loans and grants to support the creation of new solar energy sources in the State that are
owned by or directly benefit:
(i) low– to moderate–income communities located in a census tract
with an average median income at or below 80% of the average median income for the State;
(ii) overburdened or underserved communities, as defined in § 1–701
of the Environment Article; or
(iii) households with low to moderate income, as defined in § 9–2016
of this title.
(3) For fiscal year 2026 only, up to $100,000,000 of compliance fees paid
under §§ 7–705(b) and 7–705(b)(2)(i)2 of the Public Utilities Article shall be accounted for
separately within the Fund and may be used for solar development on State government
property and local government clean energy projects.
(4) (i) Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this paragraph,
compliance fees paid under § 7–705 of the Public Utilities Article may be used to provide
grants to electric companies to be refunded or credited to each residential distribution

HOUSE BILL 1640
customer based on the customer’s consumption of electricity supply that is subject to the
renewable energy portfolio standard.
(ii) The refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution
customers shall be identified on the customer’s bill as a line item identified as a “legislative
energy relief refund”.
(iii) An electric company awarded a grant under this paragraph:
1. may not retain any of the grant funds to cover overhead
expenses; and
2. shall provide all of the grant funds to residential
distribution customers.
(iv) The process under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph
related to the refunding or crediting of amounts to residential distribution customers shall
be directed and overseen by the Commission.
(i–1) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(iii) “Low and moderate income” means having an annual household
income that is at or below 120% of the area median income.
(2) Compliance fees paid under § 7–705(b–1) of the Public Utilities Article
shall be accounted for separately within the Fund and may be used only to make loans and
grants to promote increased opportunities for the growth and development of small,
minority, women–owned, and veteran–owned businesses in the State that install
geothermal systems in the State.
(j)] (1) The Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same manner
as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(3) Any repayment of principal and interest on loans made from the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(4) Balances in the Fund shall be held for the benefit of the Program, shall
be expended solely for the purposes of the Program, and may not be used for the general
obligations of government.
[(k)] (J) Expenditures from the Fund shall be made by:

HOUSE BILL 1640 29
(1) an appropriation in the annual State budget; or
(2) a budget amendment in accordance with § 7–209 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
[(l)] (K) An expenditure by budget amendment may be made under subsection
[(k)] (J) of this section only after:
(1) the Administration has submitted the proposed budget amendment and
supporting documentation to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate
Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee, House Appropriations Committee,
and House Economic Matters Committee; and
(2) the committees have had 45 days for review and comment.
[(m)] (L) (1) A loan or grant made available from the Fund to a unit of State
or local government shall comply with §§ 14–416 and 17–303 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) At least 80% of workers participating in a project or program that
receives money from the Fund must reside within 50 miles of the project or program, or
another distance defined by the local jurisdiction where the project or program is located.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Economic Development
10–802.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(2) continued exclusive reliance on traditional forms of electricity supply
entrenches the State’s dependence on fossil fuels, working against the State’s policy of
decreasing greenhouse gas production[, as evidenced by the State’s accession to the
Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative];
Article – Environment
2–107.
(a) There is a Maryland Clean Air Fund.
(b) [Except as provided in § 2–1002(g) of this title, all] ALL application fees,
permit fees, renewal fees, and funds collected by the Department under this title, OR Title

HOUSE BILL 1640
6, Subtitle 4 of this article, [or received from the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment
Fund under § 9–20B–05(g)(3)(iii) of the State Government Article,] including any civil or
administrative penalty or any fine imposed by a court under these provisions, shall be paid
into the Maryland Clean Air Fund.
2–1002.
[(g) (1) In this subsection, “allowance” means one ton of carbon dioxide that
may be bought, sold, traded, or banked for use under the Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative.
(2) Not later than June 30, 2007, the Governor shall include the State as a
full participant in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative among Mid–Atlantic and
Northeast states.
(3) The State may withdraw from the Initiative, as provided in the
December 20, 2005 memorandum of understanding of the Initiative, at any time after
January 1, 2009, if the General Assembly enacts a law to approve the withdrawal.
(4) If the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative expires and there is a
successor organization with the same purposes and goals, the Governor is encouraged to
join the State in the successor organization.
(5) Notwithstanding § 2–107 of this title, all of the proceeds from the sale
of Maryland allowances under the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative shall be deposited
in the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under § 9–20B–05 of the State
Government Article.
(6) If the State’s participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative
ceases for any reason, the Governor shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, regarding:
(i) Why participation ceased; and
(ii) A plan to reduce carbon dioxide emissions from power plants in
the State that considers the use of Maryland grown, native, warm season grasses as a
possible method of reducing carbon emissions.]
Article – Natural Resources
5–307.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Mel Noland Woodland Incentives and
Fellowship Fund.
(g) The Department shall use the Fund:

HOUSE BILL 1640 31
(7) To provide financial assistance, as provided in the State budget, for the
administration of an urban and community forestry program established under § 5–426 of
this title, including:
(i) Increasing the number of communities with tree canopy goals;
(ii) Facilitating compliance with the Chesapeake Bay Program’s
forestry targets; AND
(iii) Supporting the use of urban tree canopy expansion for air quality
improvement purposes; [and
(iv) Helping achieve implementation of Regional Greenhouse Gas
Initiative offset opportunities in urban areas;]
Article – State Government
9–20B–05.
(a) There is a Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund.
(b) The purpose of the Fund is to implement the Strategic Energy Investment
Program.
(c) The Administration shall administer the Fund.
(d) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(e) The Fund consists of:
(1) [all of the proceeds from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g) of the
Environment Article;
(2)] money appropriated in the State budget to the Program;
[(3)] (2) repayments and prepayments of principal and interest on loans
made from the Fund;
[(4)] (3) money received from any public or private source for the benefit
of the Fund;
[(5)] (4) money transferred from the Public Service Commission under §

HOUSE BILL 1640
7–207.2(d)(3) of the Public Utilities Article; and
[(6)] (5) money distributed under § 2–614.1 of the Tax – General Article.
(f) The Administration shall use the Fund:
(1) to invest in the promotion, development, and implementation of:
(i) cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs,
projects, or activities, including measurement and verification of energy savings;
(ii) renewable and clean energy resources;
(iii) climate change programs directly related to reducing or
mitigating the effects of climate change; and
(iv) demand response programs that are designed to promote
changes in electric usage by customers in response to:
1. changes in the price of electricity over time; or
2. incentives designed to induce lower electricity use at times
of high wholesale market prices or when system reliability is jeopardized;
(2) to provide targeted programs, projects, activities, and investments to
reduce electricity consumption by customers in the low–income and moderate–income
residential sectors;
(3) to provide grants, loans, and other assistance and investment as
necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes of the Program as set forth in §
9–20B–03 of this subtitle;
(4) to implement energy–related public education and outreach initiatives
regarding reducing energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions;
(5) to provide rebates under the Electric Vehicle Recharging Equipment
Rebate Program established under § 9–2009 of this title;
(6) to provide grants to encourage combined heat and power projects at
industrial facilities;
(7) to provide at least $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for fiscal year 2025
through fiscal year 2028 to the Climate Technology Founder’s Fund established under §
10–858 of the Economic Development Article;
(8) subject to subsection (f–2) of this section, to provide at least $2,100,000
in funding each fiscal year to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund established under §

HOUSE BILL 1640 33
10–835 of the Economic Development Article;
(9) to provide at least $500,000 each year to the Resiliency Hub Grant
Program Fund under § 9–2011 of this title;
(10) to provide grants through the Customer–Sited Solar Program under §
9–2016 of this title;
(11) [notwithstanding subsection (g) of this section,] to pay costs associated
with the Air and Radiation Administration within the Department of the Environment; and
(12) to pay the expenses of the Program.
(f–1) (1) Any funding provided under subsection (f)(7) of this section that is not
spent in a given fiscal year shall revert to the Fund in the following fiscal year.
(2) The Administration may provide additional funding for the purposes
stated in subsection (f)(7) of this section.
(f–2) Of the funds transferred to the Maryland Energy Innovation Fund under
subsection (f)(8) of this section:
(1) at least $1,200,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Clean Energy
Center established under § 10–806 of the Economic Development Article; and
(2) at least $900,000 may be used to fund the Maryland Energy Innovation
Institute established under § 10–829 of the Economic Development Article.
(g) [Proceeds received by the Fund from the sale of allowances under § 2–1002(g)
of the Environment Article shall be allocated as follows:
(1) at least 50% shall be credited to an energy assistance account to be used
for the Electric Universal Service Program and other electricity assistance programs in the
Department of Human Services;
(2) at least 20% shall be credited to a low and moderate income efficiency
and conservation programs account and to a general efficiency and conservation programs
account for energy efficiency and conservation programs, projects, or activities and demand
response programs, of which at least one–half shall be targeted to the low and moderate
income efficiency and conservation programs account for:
(i) the low–income residential sector at no cost to the participants
of the programs, projects, or activities; and
(ii) the moderate–income residential sector;
(3) at least 20% shall be credited to a renewable and clean energy programs

HOUSE BILL 1640
account for:
(i) renewable and clean energy programs and initiatives;
(ii) energy–related public education and outreach; and
(iii) climate change and resiliency programs; and
(4) up to 10%, but not more than $7,500,000, shall be credited to an
administrative expense account for costs related to the administration of the Fund,
including the review of electric company plans for achieving electricity savings and demand
reductions that the electric companies are required under law to submit to the
Administration.
(h) (1) Energy efficiency and conservation programs under subsection (g)(2) of
this section include:
(i) low–income energy efficiency programs;
(ii) residential and small business energy efficiency programs;
(iii) commercial and industrial energy efficiency programs;
(iv) State and local energy efficiency programs;
(v) demand response programs;
(vi) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(vii) grants to training funds and other organizations supporting job
training for deployment of energy efficiency and energy conservation technology and
equipment.
(2) Energy–related public education and outreach and renewable and clean
energy programs and initiatives under subsection (g)(3)(i) and (ii) of this section include:
(i) production incentives for specified renewable energy sources;
(ii) expansion of existing grant programs for solar, geothermal, and
wind programs;
(iii) loan programs and alternative financing mechanisms; and
(iv) consumer education and outreach programs that are designed to
reach low–income communities.
(i)] (1) The Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same manner

HOUSE BILL 1640 35
as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be paid into the Fund.
(3) Any repayment of principal and interest on loans made from the Fund
shall be paid into the Fund.
(4) Balances in the Fund shall be held for the benefit of the Program, shall
be expended solely for the purposes of the Program, and may not be used for the general
obligations of government.
[(j)] (H) Expenditures from the Fund shall be made by:
(1) an appropriation in the annual State budget; or
(2) a budget amendment in accordance with § 7–209 of the State Finance
and Procurement Article.
[(k)] (I) An expenditure by budget amendment may be made under subsection
[(j)] (H) of this section only after:
(1) the Administration has submitted the proposed budget amendment and
supporting documentation to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, Senate
Education, Energy, and the Environment Committee, House Appropriations Committee,
and House Economic Matters Committee; and
(2) the committees have had 45 days for review and comment.
[(l)] (J) (1) A loan or grant made available from the Fund to a unit of State
or local government shall comply with §§ 14–416 and 17–303 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article.
(2) At least 80% of workers participating in a project or program that
receives money from the Fund must reside within 50 miles of the project or program, or
another distance defined by the local jurisdiction where the project or program is located.
9–20C–03.
(g) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated by the State to the Fund;
(2) [money paid to the Fund by a qualified offshore wind project under §
7–704.1(h) of the Public Utilities Article;
(3)] money made available to the Fund through federal programs or private

HOUSE BILL 1640
contributions;
[(4)] (3) repayment of principal or payment of interest on a loan made
from the Fund;
[(5)] (4) proceeds from the sale, disposition, lease, or rental by the
Administration of collateral related to financing that the Administration provides under
this subtitle;
[(6)] (5) investment earnings of the Fund; and
[(7)] (6) any other money made available to the Administration for the
Fund.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding any other
law:
(a) (1) A public service company, as defined in § 1–101 of the Public Utilities
Article, may not recover from rates or any stranded cost rider any costs associated with the
implementation of Title 7, Subtitle 2, Part II of the Public Utilities Article as it existed
before October 1, 2026.
(2) Public service companies may implement voluntary energy efficiency
programs that are not funded through mandatory ratepayer charges.
(b) (1) The renewable energy portfolio standard is abolished by this Act, and
all compliance requirements, including renewable energy credits and alternative
compliance fees, are terminated.
(2) On and after the effective date of this Act, an electricity supplier may
not recover from rates any costs related to the renewable energy portfolio standard.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Governor shall immediately begin the process of withdrawing the State
from participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative.
(b) Within 30 days after receiving notice that the State is withdrawn from
participation in the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative, the Governor shall report to the
General Assembly in accordance with § 2–1002(g)(6) of the Environment Article.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 6 of this Act shall take effect contingent on:
(1) the State’s withdrawal from participation in the Regional Greenhouse
Gas Initiative; and

HOUSE BILL 1640 37
(2) the receipt by the General Assembly of the report required under §
2–1002(g)(6) of the Environment Article.
(b) Within 5 days after the report required under § 2–1002(g)(6) of the
Environment Article is received, the General Assembly shall notify the Department of
Legislative Services.
(c) If notice of the receipt of the report is received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before June 1, 2031, Section 6 of this Act shall take effect on the
date the notice is received by the Department of Legislative Services in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) If notice of the receipt of the report is not received by the Department of
Legislative Services on or before June 1, 2031, Section 6 of this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be null and void.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing
obligation or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 9 of this
Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.